Oklahoma, session 2025, SB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 91, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 90, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 91), is amended to read as follows:
Section 91. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025 July 1, 2030, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, an oversight Board board to be known as the
State Anatomical Board, to be composed of the following members:
1. The Deans deans or their designee of each accredited medical
school and osteopathic medical school within the State of Oklahoma
this state;
2. The persons heading the Department of Anatomy department of
anatomy, or comparable department, in the medical and osteopathic
medical schools or their designee;
3. Two persons appointed jointly by the presidents of
institutions of higher education within the state which have

educational programs other than medical which require on a regular
basis human anatomical materials, provided that these programs have
been approved by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;
and
4. One at-large member appointed by the Governor to represent
the interests of the citizens of this state.
B. It shall be the duty of the State Anatomical Board to
register all anatomical donor programs and non-transplant tissue
banks and to designate agents to provide for the collection,
preservation, storage, distribution, delivery, recovery from users,
cremation and final disposition of all dead human bodies used for
health science education and research in the State of Oklahoma this
state.
C. The Board shall elect from its membership a chairperson
chair who shall perform such other duties as the Board may prescribe
by rule. The Board shall have full power to establish rules for its
government, to appoint and remove officers, and to appoint an
executive director who shall keep full and complete minutes of its
transactions and manage the affairs of the Board. The expenditures
authorized in this section shall not be a charge against the state,
but shall be paid by the agent designated by the Board to receive,
store, issue, and cremate human anatomical materials. Records shall
also be kept by the agent of all bodies received and distributed for
the period of time authorized by the Records Disposition Schedule.
The name of the oversight Board board shall be the State Anatomical
Board, hereinafter called the Anatomical Board. The Anatomical
Board may, in its discretion, exempt any county, district, or
institution from the provisions of this act Sections 91 through 100
of this title in any calendar year for any length of time.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 394 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 24th day of February, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 394 Page 3